Utah statutes.
41-6a-712.   Divided highway -- Use of right-hand side -- Crossing only
where permitted.
(1)  A person operating a vehicle on a divided highway shall use the right-
hand roadway unless directed or permitted to use another roadway by a traffic-
control device or a peace officer.
(2)  A person operating a vehicle may not operate the vehicle over, across, or
within any dividing space, median, or barrier of a divided highway, except
where authorized by a traffic-control device or a peace officer.
